District of Columbia statutes.
38-704

Limitation on purchases.

The Board of Education shall purchase for use in the public schools only such books and supplies as shall have been duly recommended by the Superintendent of Schools and formally approved by the Board of Education.

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 4
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 312, 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 704, 47 DCR 6308
Additional powers and duties of Superintendent, see § 38-105.
1981 Ed., § 31-704.
1973 Ed., § 31-404.
D.C. Law 13-172 deleted “, through the Office of Contracting and Procurement” preceding “purchase for use”.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 704 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 704 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).